Massachusetts, session 194th, H4418.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6C of chapter 20 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 3, the figure “18”, and inserting in
place thereof the following figure:- 20.
SECTION 2. Said section 6C of said chapter 20, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, after the word “affairs” in line 19, the following words:- 1 of whom shall
be the director of the division of marine fisheries of the department of fish and game, or the
director’s designee; 1 of whom shall be the director of the University of Massachusetts Center
for Agriculture, Food, and the Environment, or the director’s designee;.
SECTION 3. Said section 6C of said chapter 20, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the last sentence of subsection (c) the following 4 sentences:-
Advisory committee members may be eligible for compensation at a rate fixed by the
council, as approved by the chief financial officer of the department of agricultural resources to
ensure appropriate funds are available to cover the costs. Advisory committee members shall be
of 2

eligible for compensation only to the extent otherwise permitted by chapter 268A of the general
laws and upon providing the necessary documentation required to process any such payment.
Any request for compensation shall be made by the advisory committee member to the
department of agricultural resources within 30 days of being incurred. Requests made after this
time may be ineligible for payment.
SECTION 4. Said section 6C of said chapter 20, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after subsection (g) the following subsection:-
(h) Subject to appropriation, the council shall appoint a full time food system coordinator
as an employee. The food system coordinator shall have access to all relevant agency meetings;
serve in an advisory capacity to all relevant departments to inventory existing state programs
which relate to the food system across all state agencies, including, but not limited to, agencies
associated with the council; facilitate communication and resource collaboration across state
agencies; develop and track metrics related to food system goals; identify opportunities to
eliminate duplicative efforts and strengthen complementary programs and projects; identify gaps
in services and supports and make recommendations; and provide input to help coordinate
outreach to underserved communities. The food system coordinator shall submit a report 1 week
prior to each council meeting with findings, progress updates, and recommendations to the clerks
of the senate and the house of representatives, the joint committee on agriculture and fisheries,
the council, relevant department secretaries, and relevant department commissioners.
of 2